Idaho, session 2026, H0944.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 23-404, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
23-404. DISTRIBUTION OF MONEYS IN LIQUOR ACCOUNT. (1) The moneys re-
ceived into the liquor account shall be transferred or appropriated as fol-
lows:
(a) An amount of money equal to the actual cost of purchase of alcoholic
liquor and payment of expenses of administration and operation of the
division, as determined by the director and certified quarterly to the
state controller, shall be transferred back to the division; provided,
that the amount so transferred back for administration and operation of
the division shall not exceed the amount authorized to be expended by
regular appropriation authorization.
(b) From fiscal year 2006 through fiscal year 2009, forty percent (40%)
of Beginning in fiscal year 2027, the balance remaining after transfer-
ring the amounts authorized by paragraph (a) of this subsection shall be
transferred or appropriated pursuant to this paragraph. Beginning in
fiscal year 2010, the percentage transferred pursuant to this paragraph
shall increase to forty-two percent (42%) with an increase of two per-
cent (2%) for each subsequent fiscal year thereafter until fiscal year
2014, when such percentage shall be fifty percent (50%).
(i) For fiscal year 2006 and through fiscal year 2009, one mil-
lion eight hundred thousand dollars ($1,800,000) shall be appro-
priated and paid to the cities and counties as set forth in para-
graph (c)(i) and (ii) of this subsection;
(ii) (i) Two million eighty thousand dollars ($2,080,000) shall
be transferred annually to the substance abuse treatment fund cre-
ated in section 23-408, Idaho Code;
(iii) (ii) Eight hundred thousand dollars ($800,000) shall be
transferred annually to the state community college account cre-
ated in section 33-2139, Idaho Code;
(iv) (iii) One million two hundred thousand dollars ($1,200,000)
shall be transferred annually to the public school income fund as
defined in section 33-903, Idaho Code;


(v) (iv) Six hundred fifty thousand dollars ($650,000) shall be
transferred annually to the cooperative welfare fund in the dedi-
cated fund;
(vi) (v) Six hundred eighty thousand dollars ($680,000) shall be
transferred annually to the drug court, mental health court and
family court services fund;
(vii) (vi) Four hundred forty thousand dollars ($440,000) shall
be transferred annually to the drug and mental health court super-
vision fund created in section 23-409, Idaho Code; and
(viii) The balance shall be transferred to the general fund, after
one and one-half percent (1.5%) of such balance is transferred to
the peace officers standards and training fund created in section
19-5116, Idaho Code.
(vii) Five million dollars ($5,000,000) shall be transferred an-
nually to the Idaho law enforcement fund established in section
67-2914, Idaho Code.
(c) Beginning in fiscal year 2027, from the balance remaining after the
transfers authorized by paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection, one
and one-half percent (1.5%) of such remaining balance shall be trans-
ferred to the peace officers standards and training fund established
in section 19-5116, Idaho Code, and forty-eight and one-half percent
(48.5%) of such remaining balance shall be transferred to the general
fund.
(c) (d) The remainder of the moneys received in the liquor account The
remaining fifty percent (50%) of the balance after the transfers autho-
rized by paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection shall be appropriated
and paid as follows:
(i) For fiscal year 2018, forty percent (40%) of the balance re-
maining after the transfers authorized by paragraphs (a) and, (b),
and (c) of this subsection have been made is hereby appropriated to
and shall be paid to the several counties. For fiscal year 2019,
the amount apportioned to counties shall decrease to thirty-nine
and two-tenths percent (39.2%) with a decrease of eight-tenths
percent (.8%) for each subsequent fiscal year thereafter until
fiscal year 2023 when such percentage shall be thirty-six per-
cent (36%). Each county shall be entitled to an amount in the
proportion that liquor sales through the division in that county
during the state's previous fiscal year bear to total liquor sales
through the division in the state during the state's previous fis-
cal year, except that no county shall be entitled to an amount less
than that county received in distributions from the liquor account
during the state's fiscal year 1981.
(ii) For fiscal year 2018, sixty percent (60%) of the balance re-
maining after the transfers authorized by paragraphs (a) and, (b),
and (c) of this subsection have been made is hereby appropriated to
and shall be paid to the several cities. For fiscal year 2019, the
amount apportioned to the several cities shall decrease to fifty-
seven and eight-tenths percent (57.8%) with a decrease of two and
two-tenths percent (2.2%) for each subsequent fiscal year there-
after until fiscal year 2023 when such percentage shall be forty-


nine percent (49%). Amounts paid to the several cities shall be
distributed as follows:
1. Ninety percent (90%) of the amount appropriated to the
cities shall be distributed to those cities that have a
liquor store or distribution station located within the cor-
porate limits of the city. Each such city shall be entitled
to an amount in the proportion that liquor sales through the
division in that city during the state's previous fiscal
year bear to total liquor sales through the division in the
state during the state's previous fiscal year, except that
no city shall be entitled to an amount less than that city
received in distributions from the liquor account during the
state's fiscal year 1981;
2. Ten percent (10%) of the amount appropriated to the
cities shall be distributed to those cities that do not have
a liquor store or distribution station located within the
corporate limits of the city. Each such city shall be enti-
tled to an amount in the proportion that its population bears
to the population of all cities in the state that do not have
a liquor store or distribution station located within the
corporate limits of the city, except that no city shall be
entitled to an amount less than that city received in dis-
tributions from the liquor account during the state's fiscal
year 1981.
(iii) For fiscal year 2019, an additional amount of three percent
(3%) of the balance remaining after the transfers authorized by
paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection have been made is hereby
appropriated to the several counties for deposit in the district
court fund. Such funds shall be dedicated to provide for the suit-
able and adequate quarters of the magistrate division of the dis-
trict court, including the facilities and equipment necessary to
make the space provided functional for its intended use, and shall
provide for the staff personnel, supplies and other expenses of
the magistrate division. For fiscal year 2020, the amount appor-
tioned to the several counties for deposit in the district court
fund shall be six percent (6%) with an increase of three percent
(3%) for each subsequent year until fiscal year 2023 when such per-
centage shall be fifteen percent (15%). Amounts paid to the sev-
eral counties shall be distributed as follows:
1. The first four hundred forty thousand dollars ($440,000)
shall be distributed to each of the forty-four (44) counties
in equal amounts;
2. Fifty percent (50%) of the remaining funds shall be dis-
tributed to the forty-four (44) counties in proportion to
the population of the county in relation to the population of
the state; and
3. Fifty percent (50%) of the remaining funds shall be dis-
tributed to the forty-four (44) counties in proportion to
the number of misdemeanor and infraction filings initiated
by city law enforcement officers in the county during the


state's previous fiscal year in relation to the proportion
of the number of misdemeanor and infraction filings initi-
ated by all city law enforcement officers in the state.
(2) All transfers and distributions shall be made periodically, but not
less frequently than quarterly, but the apportionments made to any county or
city that may during the succeeding three (3) year period be found to have
been in error either of computation or transmittal shall be corrected during
the fiscal year of discovery by a reduction of apportionments in the case of
over-apportionment or by an increase of apportionments in the case of under-
apportionment. The decision of the director on entitlements of counties and
cities shall be final and shall not be subject to judicial review.
(3) For purposes of this section, "city law enforcement officer" means
an individual, either employed directly by a city or by way of a contract for
law enforcement services with another city or county, authorized to investi-
gate, enforce, prosecute or punish violations of city or state statutes, or-
dinances or regulations.
SECTION 2. That Section 33-2139, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
33-2139. STATE COMMUNITY COLLEGE ACCOUNT CREATED. There is hereby
created a state community college account in the state operating fund in the
state treasurer's office to which shall be credited all moneys that may be
transferred pursuant to section 23-404(1)(b)(iii)(ii), Idaho Code. The
state treasurer shall make such disbursements from the account as may be
ordered by the state board of education in accordance with the provisions of
this act.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.